lt-LT: Footbag žaidimo stilius: „Footbag“ per tinklą; Laisvasis stilius („Freestyle“); Žongliravimas; Spardymas (rate); Daugiafunkcis; Treniruotėms / įgūdžiams lavinti; Kita
fi: Footbag-pelityyli: Verkkofootbag; Freestyle; Jonglööraus; Potkiminen (rinki); Monikäyttöinen; Harjoittelu / taitotreeni; Muu
pt-BR: Estilo de jogo de footbag: Rede de footbag; Freestyle; Malabarismo; Chute (círculo); Multiuso; Treino/prática de habilidades; Outro
fr: Style de jeu du footbag: Footbag net; Style libre; Jonglerie; Frappe (en cercle); Polyvalent; Entraînement/pratique des compétences; Autre
cs: Styl hry footbag: Footbag net; Freestyle; Žonglování; Kopání (v kruhu); Víceúčelové; Trénink / procvičování dovedností; Jiné
nl: Footbag speelstijl: Footbag-net; Freestyle; Jongleren; Kicking (cirkel); Multifunctioneel; Training/vaardigheden oefenen; Overige
ja: フットバッグのプレイスタイル: フットバッグネット; フリースタイル; ジャグリング; キッキング (サークル); 多目的; トレーニング/スキル練習; その他
pt-PT: Estilo de jogo de Footbag: Rede de footbag; Estilo livre; Malabarismo; Pontapés (círculo); Multiusos; Treino/prática de habilidades; Outro
es: Estilo de juego del footbag: Red de footbag; Estilo libre; Malabares; Patadas (círculo); Multiuso; Entrenamiento/práctica de habilidades; Otro
zh-TW: 沙包球玩法: 沙包網; 花式; 雜耍; 踢 (圍圈); 多用途; 訓練/技巧練習; 其他
da: Spillestil for footbag: Footbag net; Freestyle; Jonglering; Spil i cirkel; Multifunktionel; Træning/færdighedsøvelse; Andet
hr-HR: Stil igre footbag-a: Footbag preko mreže; Slobodni stil; Žongliranje; Dodavanje (u krugu); Višenamjenski; Trening / vježbanje vještina; Ostalo
sv: Spelstil för fotbag: Footbag net; Freestyle; Jonglering; Kickande (cirkel); Multifunktionell; Träning/färdighetsträning; Övrigt
nb: Fotsekk-spillestil: Footbag-nett; Freestyle; Sjonglering; Sparking (sirkel); Flerbruk; Trening/ferdighetsøvelse; Annet
zh-CN: 花毽玩法: 隔网沙包球; 自由式; 杂耍; 踢球（围圈）; 多用途; 训练/技巧练习; 其他
el: Στυλ παιχνιδιού Footbag: Footbag net; Freestyle; Ζογκλερικά; Λάκτισμα (σε κύκλο); Πολλαπλών χρήσεων; Προπόνηση/εξάσκηση δεξιοτήτων; Άλλο
tr: Footbag oyun stili: File; Serbest stil; Top çevirme; Vuruş (çember); Çok amaçlı; Antrenman/beceri pratiği; Diğer
hu: Footbag heki játékstílus: Footbag háló; Freestyle; Zsonglőrködés; Dekázás (körben); Többcélú; Edzés / készségfejlesztés; Egyéb
it: stile di gioco del calcio: Footbag net; Freestyle; Giocoleria; Kicking (in cerchio); Multiuso; Allenamento/pratica; Altro
de: Spielstil des Footbags: Footbag Net; Freestyle; Jonglieren; Kicken (Kreis); Mehrzweck; Training/Technikübung; Sonstiges
ko: 풋백 플레이 스타일: 풋백 넷; 프리스타일; 저글링; 키킹(서클); 다목적; 트레이닝/기술 연습; 기타
sk-SK: Štýl hry s loptičkou: Footbag net; Freestyle; Žonglovanie; Kopanie (v kruhu); Viacúčelové; Tréning/cvičenie zručností; Iné
sl-SI: Slog igre v footbagu: Mreža za footbag; Prosti slog (freestyle); Žongliranje; Brcanje (v krogu); Večnamensko; Trening/vadba veščin; Drugo
ro-RO: Stilul de joc cu sacul de fotbal: Footbag fileu; Freestyle; Jonglerie; Kicking (cerc); Multifuncțional; Antrenament/exersare abilități; Altele
th: สไตล์การเล่นฟุตแบ็ก: ฟุตแบ็กเน็ต; ฟรีสไตล์; เดาะลูก; เตะล้อมวง; อเนกประสงค์; การฝึกซ้อม/ฝึกทักษะ; อื่นๆ
ru: Стиль игры с футбэгом: Футбэг-нет; Фристайл; Жонглирование; Набивание (в кругу); Многоцелевой; Тренировка / отработка навыков; Другое
en: Footbag play style: Footbag net; Freestyle; Juggling; Kicking (circle); Multi-purpose; Training/skills practice; Other
vi: Kiểu chơi bóng bàn: Đá cầu qua lưới; Tự do; Tung hứng; Đá chuyền (vòng tròn); Đa năng; Tập luyện/rèn luyện kỹ năng; Khác
bg-BG: Стил на игра с топка за хек: Мрежа за футбег; Свободен стил (Freestyle); Жонглиране; Подаване в кръг (Kicking); Многофункционален; Тренировка/практикуване на умения; Друг
pl: Styl gry footbagiem: Footbag siatkowy; Freestyle; Żonglowanie; Odbijanie w kółku (zośka); Wielofunkcyjny; Trening / ćwiczenie trików; Inny